Utah statutes.
54-1-8.   Expenses of commission.
The Public Service Commission shall be provided by the state with such
offices, equipment and facilities as may be proper and necessary for the
performance of its duties.  All necessary expenses of the commission including
salaries of the secretary, and the compensation of all other persons employed
by the commission, and all expenses of every kind incurred in the
administration of this title shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the
use of the commission after being approved by the commission upon claims
therefor to be duly audited by the proper authority.  The commissioners and
secretary and such clerks, experts, attorneys and other subordinates as may be
employed by it, shall be entitled to receive their necessary traveling
expenses for authorized travel on business of the commission.
